Washington statutes.
RCW 12.16.040

Service of attachment—Fees.

Every such attachment may be directed to any sheriff or constable of the county in which the justice resides, and shall be executed in the same manner as a warrant; and the fees of the officer for issuing and serving the same shall be paid by the person against whom the same was issued, unless he or she show reasonable cause, to the satisfaction of the justice, for his or her omission to attend; in which case the party requiring such attachment shall pay all such costs.

[ 2010 c 8 s 3029; Code 1881 s 1872; 1873 p 370 s 171; 1854 p 233 s 60; RRS s 1901.]

NOTES:

Attachment, to whom directed—Execution: RCW 5.56.080.